Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB49.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 72-1163 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 72-1163. (a) (1) Each year the board of education of a school
district shall conduct an assessment of the educational needs of each
attendance center in the district. Such assessment shall include input from
board members, teachers employed by the school district, school site
councils and attendance center administrators. The complete assessment
shall be published on the school district's website.
(2) Information obtained from such needs assessment shall be used
by the board when approving the budget of the school district to ensure
improvement in student academic performance.
(3) In the minutes of the meeting at which the board approves its
annual budget, the board shall include that such needs assessment was
provided to conducted by the board, that the board evaluated such
assessment and how the board used such assessment in the approval of the
school district's budget.
(b) (1) Each year, each member of the board shall receive state
assessment results for the school district. Such results shall indicate the
number of students who scored at each of the levels 1, 2, 3 and 4 on such
assessments.
(2) Each year, the board of education of a school district shall review
state assessment results and, as part of such review, shall document the
following:
(A) The barriers that must be overcome to have all students achieve
proficiency above level 2 for grade level academic expectations on such
assessments;
(B) any budget actions, including, but not limited to,
recommendations on reallocation of resources that should be taken to

SB 49 2
address and remove such barriers; and
(C) the amount of time the board estimates it will take for all students
to achieve proficiency above level 2 for grade level academic expectations
on the state assessments if such budget actions are implemented.
(3)(c) The budget of the school district shall allocate or reallocate
sufficient moneys in a manner reasonably calculated such that all students
may achieve the goal set forth in K.S.A. 72-3218(c), and amendments
thereto. The board also shall prepare a summary of the budget for the
school district. Any time moneys are allocated to a fund or existing moneys
are reallocated from one fund to another fund, such allocation or
reallocation shall be identified in the budget and summary. The budgets
and summary shall be in the form prescribed by the director pursuant to
K.S.A. 79-2926, and amendments thereto.
(b)(d) The budgets, the summary of the proposed budget, the needs
assessment and the state assessment documentation shall be on file at the
administrative offices of the school district and available on the school
district's website.
(c)(e) The notice required to be published by K.S.A. 79-2929, and
amendments thereto, shall include a statement that the budgets, the
summary of the proposed budget, the needs assessment and state
assessment documentation is on file at the administrative offices of the
district and available on the school district's website.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 72-1163 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.